Utah statutes.
31A-40-203.   Covered employee.

(1) (a)  An individual is a covered employee of a professional employer organization if the individual is coemployed pursuant to a professional employer agreement subject to this chapter.

(b)  An individual who is a covered employee under a professional employer agreement is a covered employer, whether or not the professional employer organization provides the notice required by Subsection 31A-40-202(3), the earlier of the day on which:

(i)  the employee is first compensated by the professional employer organization; or

(ii)  the client notifies the professional employer organization of a new hire.

(2)  An individual who is an officer, director, shareholder, partner, or manager of a client is a covered employee:

(a)  to the extent that the client and the professional employer organization expressly agree in the professional employer agreement that the individual is a covered employee;

(b)  if the conditions of Subsection (1) are met; and

(c)  if the individual acts as an operational manager or performs day-to-day an operational service for the client.

